Utah statutes.
53A-26a-502.   Unprofessional conduct.

"Unprofessional conduct" means conduct by a certified interpreter that is defined as unprofessional conduct under this chapter or under any rules adopted under this chapter and includes:

(1)  violating, or aiding or abetting any other person to violate any provision of this chapter or rule or order regulating certified interpreters;

(2)  violating or aiding or abetting any other person to violate any generally accepted professional or ethical standard applicable to the profession of a certified interpreter; or

(3)  physically, mentally, or sexually abusing or exploiting any person through conduct connected with a certified interpreter's practice under this chapter.

